Florida, session 2026, HB6511.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
266
267 Section 1. The facts stated in the preamble to this act
268 are found and declared to be true.
269 Section 2. The Legislature acknowledges that the state's
270 system of justice yielded an imperfect result in this case and
271 that former Broward County Sheriff's Deputy Maury Hernandez
272 should be granted relief for the injuries and damages he
273 suffered while in the line of duty as a consequence of the
274 Department of Corrections' failure to enforce probation
275 regulations and policies then in place, in violation of state
Page 11 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6511-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S

HB 6511 2026
276 law.
277 Section 3. The sum of $5 million is appropriated from the
278 General Revenue Fund to the Department of Corrections for the
279 relief of Maury Hernandez for injuries and damages sustained.
280 Section 4. The Chief Financial Officer is directed to draw
281 a warrant in favor of Maury Hernandez in the amount of $5
282 million upon funds of the Department of Corrections in the State
283 Treasury, and the Chief Financial Officer is directed to pay the
284 same out of such funds in the State Treasury.
285 Section 5. It is the intent of the Legislature that any
286 lien interests held by the state arising from the treatment and
287 care of Maury Hernandez for the occurrences described in this
288 act be waived.
289 Section 6. The amount awarded under this act is intended
290 to provide the sole compensation for all present and future
291 claims arising out of the factual situation described in this
292 act. The total amount paid for attorney fees relating to this
293 claim may not exceed 25 percent of the amount awarded under this
294 act.
295 Section 7. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 12 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6511-00